California statutes. Evidence Code
(a) If the trial court has been requested to take or has taken or proposes to take judicial notice of such matter, the court shall afford each party reasonable opportunity, before the jury is instructed or before the cause is submitted for decision by the court, to present to the court information relevant to (1) the propriety of taking judicial notice of the matter and (2) the tenor of the matter to be noticed.

(b) If the trial court resorts to any source of information not received in open court, including the advice of persons learned in the subject matter, such information and its source shall be made a part of the record in the action and the court shall afford each party reasonable opportunity to meet such information before judicial notice of the matter may be taken.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

456.

If the trial court denies a request to take judicial notice of any matter, the court shall at the earliest practicable time so advise the parties and indicate for the record that it has denied the request.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

457.

If a matter judicially noticed is a matter which would otherwise have been for determination by the jury, the trial court may, and upon request shall, instruct the jury to accept as a fact the matter so noticed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

458.

The failure or refusal of the trial court to take judicial notice of a matter, or to instruct the jury with respect to the matter, does not preclude the trial court in subsequent proceedings in the action from taking judicial notice of the matter in accordance with the procedure specified in this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

459.

(a) The reviewing court shall take judicial notice of (1) each matter properly noticed by the trial court and (2) each matter that the trial court was required to notice under Section 451 or 453. The reviewing court may take judicial notice of any matter specified in Section 452. The reviewing court may take judicial notice of a matter in a tenor different from that noticed by the trial court.

(b) In determining the propriety of taking judicial notice of a matter, or the tenor thereof, the reviewing court has the same power as the trial court under Section 454.

(c) When taking judicial notice under this section of a matter specified in Section 452 or in subdivision (f) of Section 451 that is of substantial consequence to the determination of the action, the reviewing court shall comply with the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 455 if the matter was not theretofore judicially noticed in the action.

(d) In determining the propriety of taking judicial notice of a matter specified in Section 452 or in subdivision (f) of Section 451 that is of substantial consequence to the determination of the action, or the tenor thereof, if the reviewing court resorts to any source of information not received in open court or not included in the record of the action, including the advice of persons learned in the subject matter, the reviewing court shall afford each party reasonable opportunity to meet such information before judicial notice of the matter may be taken.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

460.

Where the advice of persons learned in the subject matter is required in order to enable the court to take judicial notice of a matter, the court on its own motion or on motion of any party may appoint one or more such persons to provide such advice. If the court determines to appoint such a person, he shall be appointed and compensated in the manner provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 730) of Chapter 3 of Division 6.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. BURDEN OF PROOF; BURDEN OF PRODUCING EVIDENCE; PRESUMPTIONS AND INFERENCES [500. - 670.]



CHAPTER 1. Burden of Proof [500. - 524.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [500. - 502.]

500.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a party has the burden of proof as to each fact the existence or nonexistence of which is essential to the claim for relief or defense that he is asserting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

501.

Insofar as any statute, except Section 522, assigns the burden of proof in a criminal action, such statute is subject to Penal Code Section 1096.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

502.

The court on all proper occasions shall instruct the jury as to which party bears the burden of proof on each issue and as to whether that burden requires that a party raise a reasonable doubt concerning the existence or nonexistence of a fact or that he establish the existence or nonexistence of a fact by a preponderance of the evidence, by clear and convincing proof, or by proof beyond a reasonable doubt.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Burden of Proof on Specific Issues [520. - 524.]

520.

The party claiming that a person is guilty of crime or wrongdoing has the burden of proof on that issue.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

521.

The party claiming that a person did not exercise a requisite degree of care has the burden of proof on that issue.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

522.

The party claiming that any person, including himself, is or was insane has the burden of proof on that issue.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

523.

In any action where the state is a party, regardless of who is the moving party, where (a) the boundary of land patented or otherwise granted by the state is in dispute, or (b) the validity of any state patent or grant dated prior to 1950 is in dispute, the state shall have the burden of proof on all issues relating to the historic locations of rivers, streams, and other water bodies and the authority of the state in issuing the patent or grant.

This section is not intended to nor shall it be construed to supersede existing statutes governing disputes where the state is a party and regarding title to real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 128, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

524.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in a civil proceeding to which the State Board of Equalization is a party, that board shall have the burden of proof by clear and convincing evidence in sustaining its assertion of a penalty for intent to evade or fraud against a taxpayer, with respect to any factual issue relevant to ascertaining the liability of a taxpayer.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to override any requirement for a taxpayer to substantiate any item on a return or claim filed with the State Board of Equalization.

(c) Nothing in this section shall subject a taxpayer to unreasonable search or access to
 records in violation of the United States Constitution, the California Constitution, or any other law.

(d) For purposes of this section, “taxpayer” includes a person on whom fees administered by the State Board of Equalization are imposed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 168, Sec. 1.   (AB 2195)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Burden of Producing Evidence [550. - 550.]

550.

(a) The burden of producing evidence as to a particular fact is on the party against whom a finding on that fact would be required in the absence of further evidence.

(b) The burden of producing evidence as to a particular fact is initially on the party with the burden of proof as to that fact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Presumptions and Inferences [600. - 670.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [600. - 607.]

600.

(a) A presumption is an assumption of fact that the law requires to be made from another fact or group of facts found or otherwise established in the action. A presumption is not evidence.

(b) An inference is a deduction of fact that may logically and reasonably be drawn from another fact or group of facts found or otherwise established in the action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

601.

A presumption is either conclusive or rebuttable. Every rebuttable presumption is either (a) a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence or (b) a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

602.

A statute providing that a fact or group of facts is prima facie evidence of another fact establishes a rebuttable presumption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

603.

A presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence is a presumption established to implement no public policy other than to facilitate the determination of the particular action in which the presumption is applied.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

604.

The effect of a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence is to require the trier of fact to assume the existence of the presumed fact unless and until evidence is introduced which would support a finding of its nonexistence, in which case the trier of fact shall determine the existence or nonexistence of the presumed fact from the evidence and without regard to the presumption. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the drawing of any inference that may be appropriate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

605.

A presumption affecting the burden of proof is a presumption established to implement some public policy other than to facilitate the determination of the particular action in which the presumption is applied, such as the policy in favor of establishment of a parent and child relationship, the validity of marriage, the stability of titles to property, or the security of those who entrust themselves or their property to the administration of others.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1244.)
-------------------------------------------

606.

The effect of a presumption affecting the burden of proof is to impose upon the party against whom it operates the burden of proof as to the nonexistence of the presumed fact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

607.

When a presumption affecting the burden of proof operates in a criminal action to establish presumptively any fact that is essential to the defendant’s guilt, the presumption operates only if the facts that give rise to the presumption have been found or otherwise established beyond a reasonable doubt and, in such case, the defendant need only raise a reasonable doubt as to the existence of the presumed fact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conclusive Presumptions [620. - 624.]

620.

The presumptions established by this article, and all other presumptions declared by law to be conclusive, are conclusive presumptions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

622.

The facts recited in a written instrument are conclusively presumed to be true as between the parties thereto, or their successors in interest; but this rule does not apply to the recital of a consideration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

623.

Whenever a party has, by his own statement or conduct, intentionally and deliberately led another to believe a particular thing true and to act upon such belief, he is not, in any litigation arising out of such statement or conduct, permitted to contradict it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

624.

A tenant is not permitted to deny the title of his landlord at the time of the commencement of the relation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Presumptions Affecting the Burden of Producing Evidence [630. - 647.]

630.

The presumptions established by this article, and all other rebuttable presumptions established by law that fall within the criteria of Section 603, are presumptions affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

631.

Money delivered by one to another is presumed to have been due to the latter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

632.

A thing delivered by one to another is presumed to have belonged to the latter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

633.

An obligation delivered up to the debtor is presumed to have been paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

634.

A person in possession of an order on himself for the payment of money, or delivery of a thing, is presumed to have paid the money or delivered the thing accordingly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

635.

An obligation possessed by the creditor is presumed not to have been paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

636.

The payment of earlier rent or installments is presumed from a receipt for later rent or installments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

637.

The things which a person possesses are presumed to be owned by him.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

638.

A person who exercises acts of ownership over property is presumed to be the owner of it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

639.

A judgment, when not conclusive, is presumed to correctly determine or set forth the rights of the parties, but there is no presumption that the facts essential to the judgment have been correctly determined.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

640.

A writing is presumed to have been truly dated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

641.

A letter correctly addressed and properly mailed is presumed to have been received in the ordinary course of mail.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

642.

A trustee or other person, whose duty it was to convey real property to a particular person, is presumed to have actually conveyed to him when such presumption is necessary to perfect title of such person or his successor in interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

643.

A deed or will or other writing purporting to create, terminate, or affect an interest in real or personal property is presumed to be authentic if it:

(a) Is at least 30 years old;

(b) Is in such condition as to create no suspicion concerning its authenticity;

(c) Was kept, or if found was found, in a place where such writing, if authentic, would be likely to be kept or found; and

(d) Has been generally acted upon as authentic by persons having an interest in the matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

644.

A book, purporting to be printed or published by public authority, is presumed to have been so printed or published.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

645.

A book, purporting to contain reports of cases adjudged in the tribunals of the state or nation where the book is published, is presumed to contain correct reports of such cases.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

645.1.

Printed materials, purporting to be a particular newspaper or periodical, are presumed to be that newspaper or periodical if regularly issued at average intervals not exceeding three months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

646.

(a) As used in this section, “defendant” includes any party against whom the res ipsa loquitur presumption operates.

(b) The judicial doctrine of res ipsa loquitur is a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(c) If the evidence, or facts otherwise established, would support a res ipsa loquitur presumption and the defendant has introduced evidence which would support a finding that he was not negligent or that any negligence on his part was not a proximate cause of the occurrence, the court may, and upon request shall, instruct the jury to the effect that:

(1) If the facts which would give rise to res ipsa loquitur presumption are found or otherwise established, the jury may draw the inference from such facts that a proximate cause of the occurrence was some negligent conduct on the part of the defendant; and

(2) The jury shall not find that a proximate cause of the occurrence was some negligent conduct on the part of the defendant unless the jury believes, after weighing all the evidence in the case and drawing such inferences therefrom as the jury believes are warranted, that it is more probable than not that the occurrence was caused by some negligent conduct on the part of the defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

647.

The return of a process server registered pursuant to Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 22350) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code upon process or notice establishes a presumption, affecting the burden of producing evidence, of the facts stated in the return.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 528.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Presumptions Affecting the Burden of Proof [660. - 670.]

660.

The presumptions established by this article, and all other rebuttable presumptions established by law that fall within the criteria of Section 605, are presumptions affecting the burden of proof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

662.

The owner of the legal title to property is presumed to be the owner of the full beneficial title. This presumption may be rebutted only by clear and convincing proof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

663.

A ceremonial marriage is presumed to be valid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

664.

It is presumed that official duty has been regularly performed. This presumption does not apply on an issue as to the lawfulness of an arrest if it is found or otherwise established that the arrest was made without a warrant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

665.

A person is presumed to intend the ordinary consequences of his voluntary act. This presumption is inapplicable in a criminal action to establish the specific intent of the defendant where specific intent is an element of the crime charged.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

666.

Any court of this state or the United States, or any court of general jurisdiction in any other state or nation, or any judge of such a court, acting as such, is presumed to have acted in the lawful exercise of its jurisdiction. This presumption applies only when the act of the court or judge is under collateral attack.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

667.

A person not heard from in five years is presumed to be dead.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 201, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

668.

An unlawful intent is presumed from the doing of an unlawful act. This presumption is inapplicable in a criminal action to establish the specific intent of the defendant where specific intent is an element of the crime charged.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

669.

(a) The failure of a person to exercise due care is presumed if:

(1) He violated a statute, ordinance, or regulation of a public entity;

(2) The violation proximately caused death or injury to person or property;

(3) The death or injury resulted from an occurrence of the nature which the statute, ordinance, or regulation was designed to prevent; and

(4) The person suffering the death or the injury to his person or property was one of the class of persons for whose protection the statute, ordinance, or regulation was adopted.

(b) This presumption may be rebutted by proof that:

(1) The person violating the statute, ordinance, or regulation did what might reasonably be expected of a person of ordinary prudence, acting under similar circumstances, who desired to comply with the law; or

(2) The person violating the statute, ordinance, or regulation was a child and exercised the degree of care ordinarily exercised by persons of his maturity, intelligence, and capacity under similar circumstances, but the presumption may not be rebutted by such proof if the violation occurred in the course of an activity normally engaged in only by adults and requiring adult qualifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 650.)
-------------------------------------------

669.1.

A rule, policy, manual, or guideline of state or local government setting forth standards of conduct or guidelines for its employees in the conduct of their public employment shall not be considered a statute, ordinance, or regulation of that public entity within the meaning of Section 669, unless the rule, manual, policy, or guideline has been formally adopted as a statute, as an ordinance of a local governmental entity in this state empowered to adopt ordinances, or as a regulation by an agency of the state pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), or by an agency of the United States government pursuant to the federal Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 5001) of Title 5 of the United States Code). This section affects only the presumption set forth in Section 669, and is not otherwise intended to affect the admissibility or inadmissibility of the rule, policy, manual, or guideline under other provisions of law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1207, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

669.5.

(a) Any ordinance enacted by the governing body of a city, county, or city and county which (1) directly limits, by number, the building permits that may be issued for residential construction or the buildable lots which may be developed for residential purposes, or (2) changes the standards of residential development on vacant land so that the governing body’s zoning is rendered in violation of Section 65913.1 of the Government Code is presumed to have an impact on the supply of residential units available in an area which includes territory outside the jurisdiction of the city, county, or city and county.

(b) With respect to any action which
 challenges the validity of an ordinance specified in subdivision (a) the city, county, or city and county enacting the ordinance shall bear the burden of proof that the ordinance is necessary for the protection of the public health, safety, or welfare of the population of the city, county, or city and county.

(c) This section does not apply to state and federal building code requirements or local ordinances which (1) impose a moratorium, to protect the public health and safety, on residential construction for a specified period of time, if, under the terms of the ordinance, the moratorium will cease when the public health or safety is no longer jeopardized by the construction, (2) create agricultural preserves under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code, or (3)
 restrict the number of buildable parcels or designate lands within a zone for nonresidential uses in order to protect agricultural uses as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 51201 of the Government
 Code or open-space land as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 65560 of the Government Code.

(d) This section shall not apply to a voter approved ordinance adopted by referendum or initiative prior to the effective date of this section which (1) requires the city, county, or city and county to establish a population growth limit which represents its fair share of each year’s statewide population growth, or (2) which sets a growth rate of no more than the average population growth rate experienced by the state as a whole. Paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) does not apply to a voter-approved ordinance adopted by referendum or initiative which exempts housing affordable to persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, or which otherwise provides low- and
 moderate-income housing sites equivalent to such an exemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 434, Sec. 2.   (SB 732)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

670.

(a) In any dispute concerning payment by means of a check, a copy of the check produced in accordance with Section 1550 of the Evidence Code, together with the original bank statement that reflects payment of the check by the bank on which it was drawn or a copy thereof produced in the same manner, creates a presumption that the check has been paid.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Bank” means any person engaged in the business of banking and includes, in addition to a commercial bank, a savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union.

(2) “Check” means a draft, other than a documentary draft, payable on demand and drawn on a bank, even though it is described by another term, such as “share draft” or “negotiable order of withdrawal.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6. WITNESSES [700. - 795.]



CHAPTER 1. Competency [700. - 704.]

700.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, every person, irrespective of age, is qualified to be a witness and no person is disqualified to testify to any matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 884, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

701.

(a) A person is disqualified to be a witness if he or she is:

(1) Incapable of expressing himself or herself concerning the matter so as to be understood, either directly or through interpretation by one who can understand him; or

(2) Incapable of understanding the duty of a witness to tell the truth.

(b) In any proceeding held outside the presence of a jury, the court may reserve challenges to the competency of a witness until the conclusion of the direct examination of that witness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 884, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

702.

(a) Subject to Section 801, the testimony of a witness concerning a particular matter is inadmissible unless he has personal knowledge of the matter. Against the objection of a party, such personal knowledge must be shown before the witness may testify concerning the matter.

(b) A witness’ personal knowledge of a matter may be shown by any otherwise admissible evidence, including his own testimony.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

703.

(a) Before the judge presiding at the trial of an action may be called to testify in that trial as a witness, he shall, in proceedings held out of the presence and hearing of the jury, inform the parties of the information he has concerning any fact or matter about which he will be called to testify.

(b) Against the objection of a party, the judge presiding at the trial of an action may not testify in that trial as a witness. Upon such objection, the judge shall declare a mistrial and order the action assigned for trial before another judge.

(c) The calling of the judge presiding at a trial to testify in that trial as a witness shall be deemed a consent to the granting of a motion for mistrial, and an objection to such calling of a judge shall be deemed a motion for mistrial. 

(d) In the absence of objection by a party, the judge presiding at the trial of an action may testify in that trial as a witness.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

703.5.

No person presiding at any judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding, and no arbitrator or mediator, shall be competent to testify, in any subsequent civil proceeding, as to any statement, conduct, decision, or ruling, occurring at or in conjunction with the prior proceeding, except as to a statement or conduct that could (a) give rise to civil or criminal contempt, (b) constitute a crime, (c) be the subject of investigation by the State Bar or Commission on Judicial Performance, or (d) give rise to disqualification proceedings under paragraph (1) or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 170.1 of the Code of Civil Procedure. However, this section does not apply to a mediator with regard to any mediation under Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 3160) of Part 2 of Division 8 of the Family Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

704.

(a) Before a juror sworn and impaneled in the trial of an action may be called to testify before the jury in that trial as a witness, he shall, in proceedings conducted by the court out of the presence and hearing of the remaining jurors, inform the parties of the information he has concerning any fact or matter about which he will be called to testify.

(b) Against the objection of a party, a juror sworn and impaneled in the trial of an action may not testify before the jury in that trial as a witness. Upon such objection, the court shall declare a mistrial and order the action assigned for trial before another jury.

(c) The calling of a juror to testify before the jury as a witness shall be deemed a consent to the granting of a motion for mistrial, and an objection to such calling of a juror shall be deemed a motion for mistrial.

(d) In the absence of objection by a party, a juror sworn and impaneled in the trial of an action may be compelled to testify in that trial as a witness.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Oath and Confrontation [710. - 712.]

710.

Every witness before testifying shall take an oath or make an affirmation or declaration in the form provided by law, except that a child under the age of 10 or a dependent person with a substantial cognitive impairment, in the court’s discretion, may be required only to promise to tell the truth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 823, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

711.

At the trial of an action, a witness can be heard only in the presence and subject to the examination of all the parties to the action, if they choose to attend and examine.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

712.

Notwithstanding Sections 711 and 1200, at the trial of a criminal action, evidence of the technique used in taking blood samples may be given by a registered nurse, licensed vocational nurse, or licensed clinical laboratory technologist or clinical laboratory bioanalyst, by means of an affidavit. The affidavit shall be admissible, provided the party offering the affidavit as evidence has served all other parties to the action, or their counsel, with a copy of the affidavit no less than 10 days prior to trial. Nothing in this section shall preclude any party or his counsel from objecting to the introduction of the affidavit at any time, and requiring the attendance of the affiant, or compelling attendance by subpoena.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Expert Witnesses [720. - 733.]



  ARTICLE 1. Expert Witnesses Generally [720. - 723.]

720.

(a) A person is qualified to testify as an expert if he has special knowledge, skill, experience, training, or education sufficient to qualify him as an expert on the subject to which his testimony relates. Against the objection of a party, such special knowledge, skill, experience, training, or education must be shown before the witness may testify as an expert.

(b) A witness’ special knowledge, skill, experience, training, or education may be shown by any otherwise admissible evidence, including his own testimony.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

721.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a witness testifying as an expert may be cross-examined to the same extent as any other witness and, in addition, may be fully cross-examined as to (1) his or her qualifications, (2) the subject to which his or her expert testimony relates, and (3) the matter upon which his or her opinion is based and the reasons for his or her opinion.

(b) If a witness testifying as an expert testifies in the form of an opinion, he or she may not be cross-examined in regard to the content or tenor of any scientific, technical, or professional text, treatise, journal, or similar publication unless any of the following occurs:

(1) The witness referred to, considered, or relied upon such publication in arriving at or forming his or her opinion.

(2) The publication has been admitted in evidence.

(3) The publication has been established as a reliable authority by the testimony or admission of the witness or by other expert testimony or by judicial notice.

If admitted, relevant portions of the publication may be read into evidence but may not be received as exhibits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 892, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

722.

(a) The fact of the appointment of an expert witness by the court may be revealed to the trier of fact.

(b) The compensation and expenses paid or to be paid to an expert witness by the party calling him is a proper subject of inquiry by any adverse party as relevant to the credibility of the witness and the weight of his testimony.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

723.

The court may, at any time before or during the trial of an action, limit the number of expert witnesses to be called by any party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Appointment of Expert Witness by Court [730. - 733.]

730.

When it appears to the court, at any time before or during the trial of an action, that expert evidence is or may be required by the court or by any party to the action, the court on its own motion or on motion of any party may appoint one or more experts to investigate, to render a report as may be ordered by the court, and to testify as an expert at the trial of the action relative to the fact or matter as to which the expert evidence is or may be required. The court may fix the compensation for these services, if any, rendered by any person appointed under this section, in addition to any service as a witness, at the amount as seems reasonable to the court.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a person to perform any act for which a license is required unless the person holds the appropriate license to lawfully perform that act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 295, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

731.

(a) (1) In all criminal actions and juvenile court proceedings, the compensation fixed under Section 730 shall be a charge against the county in which the action or proceeding is pending and shall be paid out of the treasury of that county on order of the court.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the expert is appointed for the court’s needs, the compensation shall be a charge against the court.

(b) In any county in which the superior court so provides, the compensation fixed under Section 730 for medical experts appointed for the court’s needs in civil actions shall be a charge against the court.
 In any county in which the board of supervisors so provides, the compensation fixed under Section 730 for medical experts appointed in civil actions, for purposes other than the court’s needs, shall be a charge against and paid out of the treasury of that county on order of the court.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, in all civil actions, the compensation fixed under Section 730 shall, in the first instance, be apportioned and charged to the several parties in a proportion as the court may determine and may thereafter be taxed and allowed in like manner as other costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 470, Sec. 8.   (AB 1529)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

732.

Any expert appointed by the court under Section 730 may be called and examined by the court or by any party to the action. When such witness is called and examined by the court, the parties have the same right as is expressed in Section 775 to cross-examine the witness and to object to the questions asked and the evidence adduced.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

733.

Nothing contained in this article shall be deemed or construed to prevent any party to any action from producing other expert evidence on the same fact or matter mentioned in Section 730; but, where other expert witnesses are called by a party to the action, their fees shall be paid by the party calling them and only ordinary witness fees shall be taxed as costs in the action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Interpreters and Translators [750. - 757.]

750.

A person who serves as an interpreter or translator in any action is subject to all the rules of law relating to witnesses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

751.

(a) An interpreter shall take an oath that he or she will make a true interpretation to the witness in a language that the witness understands and that he or she will make a true interpretation of the witness’ answers to questions to counsel, court, or jury, in the English language, with his or her best skill and judgment.

(b) In any proceeding in which a deaf or hard-of-hearing person is testifying under oath, the interpreter certified pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 754 shall advise the court whenever he or she is unable to comply with his or her oath taken pursuant to subdivision (a).
